District of Columbia statutes.
22-3811

Criminal law unchanged.

Nothing in this chapter shall alter in any respect the tests of mental capacity applied in criminal prosecutions under the laws of the District of Columbia.

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 350, ch. 428, title II, § 209
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 10, 44 DCR 1408
Unemployment compensation, eligibility, see § 51-109.
1981 Ed., § 22-3511.
1973 Ed., § 22-3511.